test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-INTR-IPFV-0i-xaatla_run-out.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - xààtł'á[run-out] :
    xààtł'á[run-out]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg1:       xàstł'á
    xààtł'á[run-out]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg2:       xàniitł'á
    xààtł'á[run-out]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg3:       xààtł'á
    xààtł'á[run-out]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl1:       [xààsiìtł'á, xààsaàtł'á]
    xààtł'á[run-out]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl1+Distr: [xàdààsiìtł'á, xàdààsaàtł'á]
    xààtł'á[run-out]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl2:       xàstł'á
    xààtł'á[run-out]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl2+Distr: xàdàstł'á
    xààtł'á[run-out]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl3:       xàgiitł'á
    xààtł'á[run-out]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl3+Distr: xàdàgiitł'á
    xààtł'á[run-out]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg4:       xàts'iitł'á
    xààtł'á[run-out]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg4+Distr: xàdàts'iitł'á
